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DTC C 1291 / 48 VGRS ECU Communication Circuit
Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The circuit is used to send TRC & VSC control information from the skid control ECU to the VGRS ECU
(VSC+,VSC −),andVGRScontrol information fromtheVGRSECUto theskidcontrolECU(AFS+,AFS −).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1291 /48

Either of the following 1. or 2. continues for 5 sec.:
1.ECUIG1 terminal voltage is9.5V to17.0Vanddata

transmission to theVGRSECUis impossible.
2.ECUIG1 terminal voltage is9.5V to17.0Vanddata

receiving from theVGRS ECU is impossible.

SAFS+orAFS − circuit
SVSC+orVSC − circuit
SVGRSECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check skid control ECU communication.

(REFERENCE) INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the skid control ECU.
(b) Connect the oscilloscope to the each of terminals AFS+

or VSC+ and GND of the skid control ECU.
CHECK:
Start the engine, and check the signal waveform.

NG Check and replace skid control ECU.

OK

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between each of ter-
minals AFS+, AFS−, VSC+, VSC− of skid control ECU and VGRS ECU (See page
IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace VGRS ECU.


